California statutes. Business and Professions Code
-------------------------------------------

6158.5.

(a) This article applies to all lawyers, licensees, law partnerships, law corporations, entities subject to regulation under Section 6155, advertising collectives, cooperatives, or other individuals, including nonlawyers, or groups advertising the availability of legal services.

(b) Subdivisions (a) to (k), inclusive, of Section 6158.4 do not apply to qualified legal services
 projects as defined in Article 14 (commencing with Section 6210) and nonprofit lawyer referral services certified under Section 6155.

(c) Sections 6157 to 6158.5, inclusive, do not apply to the media in which the advertising is displayed or to an advertising agency that prepares the contents of an advertisement and is not directly involved in the formation or operation of lawyer advertising collectives or cooperatives, referral services, or other groups existing primarily for the purpose of advertising the availability of legal services or making referrals to attorneys.

(d) This article does not apply to broadcasters that disseminate the advertisements subject to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 645, Sec. 7.   (SB 37)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6158.7.

A violation of Section 6157.1, subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 6157.2, or Section 6157.3, 6158, 6158.1, or 6158.3 by a licensee shall be cause for discipline by the State Bar. In addition to the existing grounds for initiating a disciplinary proceeding set forth in a statute or in the Rules of Professional Conduct, the State Bar may commence an investigation based upon a complaint filed by a person pursuant to Section 6158.4. The State Bar’s decision pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 6158.4 shall be admissible, but shall not be determinative, in any disciplinary proceeding brought as a result of that complaint.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 645, Sec. 8.   (SB 37)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6159.

The court shall report the name, address, and professional license number of any person found in violation of this article to the appropriate professional licensing agency for review and possible disciplinary action.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 6157.5 by Stats. 1994, Ch. 711, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6159.1.

A true and correct copy of any advertisement made by a person or licensee shall be retained for one year by the person or licensee who pays for an advertisement soliciting employment of legal services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 121.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6159.2.

(a) Nothing in this article shall be deemed to limit or preclude enforcement of any other provision of law, or of any court rule, or of the State Bar Rules of Professional Conduct.

(b) Nothing in this article shall limit the right of advertising protected under the Constitution of the State of California or of the United States. If any provision of this article is found to violate either Constitution, that provision is severable and the remaining provisions shall be enforceable without the severed provision.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 6157.7 by Stats. 1994, Ch. 711, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.6. Legal Aid Organizations [6159.5. - 6159.53.]

6159.5.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Legal aid programs provide a valuable service to the public by providing free legal services to the poor.

(b) Private, for-profit organizations that have no lawyers have been using the name “legal aid” in order to obtain business from people who believe they are obtaining services from a nonprofit legal aid organization.

(c) Public opinion research has shown that the term “legal aid” is commonly understood by the public to mean free legal assistance for the poor.

(d) Members of the public seeking free legal
 assistance are often referred by telephone and other directory assistance information providers to for-profit organizations that charge a fee for their services, and there are a large number of listings in many telephone directories for “legal aid” that are not nonprofit but are actually for-profit organizations.

(e) The Los Angeles Superior Court has held that there is a common law trademark on the name “legal aid,” which means legal services for the poor provided by a nonprofit organization.

(f) The public will be benefited if for-profit organizations are prohibited from using the term “legal aid,” in order to avoid confusion.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 457, Sec. 3.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6159.51.

For purposes of this article, “legal aid organization” means a nonprofit organization that provides civil legal services for the poor without charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 457, Sec. 3.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6159.52.

It is unlawful for any person or organization to use the term “legal aid,” “legal aide,” or any confusingly similar name in any firm name, trade name, fictitious business name, or any other designation, or on any advertisement, letterhead, business card, or sign, unless the person or organization is a legal aid organization subject to fair use principles for nominative, descriptive, or noncommercial use.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 457, Sec. 3.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6159.53.

(a) Any consumer injured by a violation of Section 6159.52 may file a complaint and seek injunctive relief, restitution, and damages in the superior court of any county in which the defendant maintains an office, advertises, or is listed in a telephone directory.

(b) A person who violates Section 6159.52 shall be subject to an injunction against further violation of Section 6159.52 by any legal aid organization that maintains an office in any county in which the defendant maintains an office, advertises, or is listed in a telephone directory. In an action under this subdivision, it is not necessary to allege or prove actual damage to the plaintiff, and irreparable harm and interim harm to the plaintiff shall be presumed.

(c) Reasonable attorney’s fees shall be awarded to the prevailing plaintiff in any action under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 457, Sec. 3.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Law Corporations [6160. - 6172.]

6160.

A law corporation is a corporation which is registered with the State Bar of California and has a currently effective certificate of registration from the State Bar pursuant to the Professional Corporation Act, as contained in Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, and this article. Subject to all applicable statutes, rules and regulations, such law corporation is entitled to practice law. With respect to a law corporation the governmental agency referred to in the Professional Corporation Act is the State Bar.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1375.)
-------------------------------------------

6161.

An applicant for registration as a law corporation shall supply to the State Bar all necessary and pertinent documents and information requested by the State Bar concerning the applicant’s plan of operation, including, but not limited to, a copy of its articles of incorporation, certified by the Secretary of State, a copy of its bylaws, certified by the secretary of the corporation, the name and address of the corporation, the names and addresses of its officers, directors, shareholders, members, if any, and employees who will render professional services, the address of each office, and any fictitious name or names which the corporation intends to use. The State Bar may provide forms of application. If the Board of Trustees or a committee authorized by it finds that
 the corporation is duly organized and existing or duly qualified for the transaction of intrastate business pursuant to the General Corporation Law, or pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 13406 of the Corporations Code, that each officer (except as provided in Section 13403 of the Corporations Code), director, shareholder (except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 13406 of the Corporations Code), and each employee who will render professional services is a licensed person as defined in the Professional Corporation Act, or a person licensed to render the same professional services in the jurisdiction or jurisdictions in which the person practices, and that from the application it appears that the affairs of the corporation will be conducted in compliance with law and the rules and regulations of the State Bar, the State Bar shall upon payment of the registration fee in such amount as it may determine issue a certificate of registration. The applicant shall include with the application, for each
 shareholder of the corporation licensed in a foreign country but not in this state or in any other state, territory, or possession of the United States, a certificate from the authority in the foreign country currently having final jurisdiction over the practice of law, which shall verify the shareholder’s admission to practice in the foreign country, the date thereof, and the fact that the shareholder is currently in good standing as an attorney or counselor at law or the equivalent. If the certificate is not in English, there shall be included with the certificate a duly authenticated English translation thereof. The application shall be signed and verified by an officer of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 417, Sec. 50.   (SB 163)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6161.1.

Each law corporation shall renew its certificate of registration annually at a time to be fixed by the State Bar and shall pay a fee therefor which shall be fixed by the State Bar in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 6163.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 465, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

6161.2.

All fees for registration and renewal paid pursuant to Sections 6161 and 6161.1 shall be paid into the treasury of the State Bar and shall be used for its regulatory and disciplinary purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 2, Sec. 5.   (SB 55)   Effective January 25, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6162.

Within such time as the State Bar may by rule provide, the law corporation shall report in writing to the State Bar any change in directors, officers, employees performing professional services and share ownership, and amendments to its articles of incorporation and bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1375.)
-------------------------------------------

6163.

(a) Each law corporation shall file with the State Bar annually and at such other times as the State Bar may require a report containing such information pertaining to qualification and compliance with the statutes, rules, and regulations referred to in Section 6127.5 as the State Bar may determine. The fee for filing such a report shall be fixed by the State Bar. All reports shall be signed and verified by an officer of the corporation. The State Bar may fix a penalty for the late filing of an annual report in an amount not to exceed double the amount of the applicable filing fee and may also fix the date upon which the penalty shall attach if the report has not been filed and the fee paid prior to that date. The date upon which the penalty shall attach shall be not less than 31 days following the date fixed for filing the report. The filing of the annual report together with the filing fee and any penalty due for late filing constitutes the annual renewal of the certificate of registration. The fee fixed by the board for the filing of the annual report and any penalty due for late filing constitutes the fee required by Section 6161.1 for renewal of the certificate for the year in which the annual report is due to be filed.

(b) The certificate of registration of any law corporation failing to file the annual report, renew its certificate, and pay the fee therefor and any penalty due thereon for late filing, shall be suspended 60 days following written notice of delinquency. The written notice shall be mailed to the corporation at its current office or other address for State Bar purposes, as shown on the law corporation records of the State Bar. The suspension shall be ordered by the chief executive officer of the State Bar or his or her designee.

(c) A certificate of registration suspended pursuant to subdivision (b) may be reinstated upon the filing by the law corporation of all delinquent annual reports and payment of all accrued fees and penalties required by this section and Section 6161.1 which are due on the date of the suspension, and any such fees and penalties which become due on or before the date of the reinstatement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 465, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

6165.

Except as provided in Sections 13403 and 13406 of the Corporations Code, each director, shareholder, and each officer of a law corporation shall be a licensed person as defined in the Professional Corporation Act, or a person licensed to render the same professional services in the jurisdiction or jurisdictions in which the person practices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 955, Sec. 2.5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6166.

The income of a law corporation attributable to professional services rendered while a shareholder is a disqualified person (as defined in the Professional Corporation Act) shall not in any manner accrue to the benefit of such shareholder or his shares in the law corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1375.)
-------------------------------------------

6167.

A law corporation shall not do or fail to do any act the doing of which or the failure to do which would constitute a cause for discipline of a licensee of the State Bar, under any statute, rule, or regulation now or hereafter in effect. In the conduct of its business, it shall observe and be bound by such statutes, rules, and regulations to the same extent as if specifically designated therein as a licensee of the State Bar.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 122.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6168.

(a) The State Bar may conduct an investigation of the conduct of the business of a law corporation.

(b) Upon that investigation, the Board of Trustees, or a committee authorized by it, shall have power to issue subpoenas, administer oaths, examine witnesses, and compel the production of records, in the same manner as upon an investigation or formal hearing in a disciplinary matter under the State Bar Act. The investigation shall be private and confidential and shall not be disclosed pursuant to any state law, including, but not limited to, the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), except to the extent that
 disclosure of facts and information may be required if a cease and desist order is thereafter issued and subsequent proceedings are had.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 20.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

6169.

(a) When there is reason to believe that a law corporation has violated or is about to violate any of the provisions of this article or the Professional Corporation Act or of any other pertinent statute, rule, or regulation, the State Bar may issue a notice directing the corporation to show cause why it should not be ordered to cease and desist from specified acts or conduct or its certificate of registration should not be suspended or revoked. A copy of the notice shall be served upon the corporation in the manner provided for service of summons upon a California corporation.

(b) A hearing upon the notice to show cause shall be held before a standing or special committee appointed by
 the board of trustees. Upon the hearing, the State Bar and the corporation shall be entitled to the issue of subpoenas, to be represented by counsel, to present evidence, and examine and cross-examine witnesses.

(c) The hearing committee shall make findings in writing and shall either recommend that the proceeding be dismissed or that a cease and desist order be issued or that the certificate of registration of the corporation be suspended or revoked. The determination may be reviewed by the board of trustees or by a committee authorized by the Board of Trustees to act in its stead, upon written petition for review, filed with the State Bar by the corporation or the State Bar within 20 days after service of the findings and recommendation. Upon review, the board of trustees or the committee may take additional evidence, may adopt new or amended findings, and make such order as may be just, as to the notice to show cause.

(d) Subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) shall not apply to the suspension or revocation of the certificate of registration of a corporation in either of the following cases:

(1) The death of a sole shareholder, as provided in Section 6171.1.

(2) Failure to file the annual report and renew the certificate of registration, as provided in Sections 6161.1 and 6163.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 417, Sec. 52.   (SB 163)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6170.

Any action of the State Bar or the Board of Trustees or a committee of the State Bar, or the chief executive officer of the State Bar or the designee of the chief executive officer, provided for in this article, may be reviewed by the Supreme Court by petition for review pursuant to rules prescribed by the Supreme Court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 417, Sec. 53.   (SB 163)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6171.

With the approval of the Supreme Court, the State Bar may formulate and enforce rules and regulations to carry out the purposes and objectives of this article, including rules and regulations requiring all of the following:

(a) That the articles of incorporation or bylaws of a law corporation shall include a provision whereby the capital stock of the corporation owned by a disqualified person (as defined in the Professional Corporation Act) or a deceased person shall be sold to the corporation or to the remaining shareholders of the corporation within such time as the rules and regulations may provide.

(b) That a law corporation, as a condition of obtaining a certificate pursuant to the Professional Corporation Act and this article, shall provide and maintain security by insurance or otherwise for claims against it by its clients for errors and omissions arising out of the rendering of professional services.

(c) That the name of the law corporation and any name or names under which it renders legal services shall be in compliance with the rules and regulations.

(d) That the law corporation shall obtain from the State Bar, and maintain current, a fictitious name permit when required by the rules and regulations; that the permit may be obtained, maintained, suspended, and revoked pursuant to procedures set forth in the rules and regulations; and that the law corporation shall pay an application and renewal fee for the permit in such amounts as may be determined by the State Bar.

(e) This section shall become operative January 1, 1996.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 955, Sec. 3.5.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Section operative January 1, 1996, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6171.1.

Six months and one day following the death of a sole shareholder of a law corporation, the certificate of registration of the law corporation shall be deemed canceled by operation of this section. However, the certificate may be sooner canceled by receipt in the State Bar office of a written request for the cancellation from the personal representative or sole heir of the deceased shareholder or the person to whom the shares passed by will or operation of law following the death of the sole shareholder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

6172.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as affecting or impairing the disciplinary powers and authority of the Supreme Court or of the State Bar in respect of conduct of licensees of the State Bar nor modifying the statutes and rules governing such conduct, except as expressly provided in this article and except that licensees of the State Bar may properly render legal services as officers or employees of a law corporation and may participate as shareholders, officers, and directors thereof, under the terms and conditions provided by this article and the Professional Corporation Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 123.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.1. Alternative Dispute Resolution Certification Program [6173. - 6173.]

6173.

(a) (1) The State Bar shall create a program to certify alternative dispute resolution firms, providers, or practitioners.

(2) A program created pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not require a firm, provider, or practitioner to be a licensee of the State Bar in order to be certified under the program.

(b) The program shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Procedures established by the State Bar for a firm, provider, or practitioner to become a certified alternative dispute resolution firm, provider, or practitioner that include, but are not limited to, a requirement that the firm,
 provider, or practitioner verify all of the following:

(A) The firm, provider, or practitioner requires, at a minimum, its arbitrators to comply with the Ethics Standards for Neutral Arbitrators in Contractual Arbitration as adopted by the Judicial Council pursuant to Section 1281.85 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(B) The firm, provider, or practitioner requires, at a minimum, its mediators to comply with ethical standards that are equivalent to the Rules of Conduct for Mediators in Court-Connected Mediation Programs for General Civil Cases as provided in Rules 3.850 to 3.860, inclusive, of the California Rules of Court.

(C) The firm, provider, or practitioner has procedures in place for persons to make complaints regarding the failure of an arbitrator or mediator of the firm, provider, or practitioner to comply
 with the standards described in subparagraph (A) or (B), as applicable. For mediators, those complaint procedures shall be substantially similar to the complaint procedures specified in Article 3 (commencing with Rule 3.865) of Chapter 3 of Division 8 of Title 3 of the California Rules of Court.

(D) The firm, provider, or practitioner has procedures to remedy failures of arbitrators or mediators to comply with the standards described in subparagraph (A) or (B), as applicable.

(2) Different levels or tiers for certification that meet both of the following requirements:

(A) Higher levels or tiers are awarded to firms, providers, or practitioners that demonstrate a higher level of commitment to accountability and consumer protection based on criteria or other standards, including, but not limited to, additional
 education or training, adopted by the State Bar.

(B) The levels or tiers do not reflect an assessment of the quality of a firm, provider, or practitioner.

(3) Authority for the State Bar to deny or revoke certification for a failure to meet or maintain certification standards.

(c) (1) The State Bar may charge an alternative dispute resolution firm, provider, or practitioner seeking certification pursuant to this section a fee to cover the reasonable costs of administering the program.

(2) The fee charged pursuant to paragraph (1) may be higher in the early years of the program to reimburse the State Bar for costs related to the planning and establishment of the program, including, but not limited to, technology and preliminary
 staffing costs.

(3) The State Bar shall not use any moneys received from the annual license fees collected pursuant to Section 6140 or 6141 for any costs associated with this section.

(d) For purposes of this article:

(1) “Alternative dispute resolution” means mediation, arbitration, conciliation, or other nonjudicial procedure that involves a neutral party in the decisionmaking process.

(2) “Program” means the program created pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 405, Sec. 11.   (SB 253)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.2. Limited Liability Partnerships [6174. - 6174.5.]

6174.

Pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 16953 of the Corporations Code, a limited liability partnership providing legal services shall comply with all administrative or filing requirements of the State Bar, including, but not limited to, the payment of fees, and all rules and regulations adopted by the board and approved by the Supreme Court. All fees shall be paid into the treasury of the State Bar and shall be used for its regulatory and disciplinary purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 2, Sec. 6.   (SB 55)   Effective January 25, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6174.5.

At the time of filing an Application for Issuance of a Certificate of Registration as a Limited Liability Partnership pursuant to the Rules of the State Bar, an applicant for registration shall also file with the State Bar a separate form stating that the limited liability partnership has complied with the security requirements described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 16956 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 2, Sec. 6.   (SB 55)   Effective January 25, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.5. Provision of Financial Services by Lawyers [6175. - 6177.]

6175.

As used in this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Lawyer” means a licensee of the State Bar or a person who is admitted and in good standing and eligible to practice before the bar of any United States court or the highest court of the District of Columbia or any state, territory, or insular possession of the United States, or licensed to practice law in, or is admitted in good standing and eligible to practice before the bar of the highest court of, a foreign country or any political subdivision thereof, and includes any agent of the lawyer or law firm or law corporation doing business in the state.

(b) “Client” means a person who has, within the three years preceding
 the sale of financial products by a lawyer to that person, employed that lawyer for legal services. The settlor and trustee of a trust shall be considered one person.

(c) “Elder” and “dependent elder” shall have the meaning as defined in Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 15600) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(d) “Financial products” means long-term care insurance, life insurance, and annuities governed by the Insurance Code, or its successors.

(e) “Sell” means to act as a broker for a commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 124.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6175.3.

A lawyer, while acting as a fiduciary, may sell financial products to a client who is an elder or dependent adult with whom the lawyer has or has had, within the preceding three years, an attorney-client relationship, if the transaction or acquisition and its terms are fair and reasonable to the client, and if the lawyer provides that client with a disclosure that satisfies all of the following conditions:

(a) The disclosure is in writing and is clear and conspicuous. The disclosure shall be a separate document, appropriately entitled, in 12-point print with one inch of space on all borders.

(b) The disclosure, in a manner that should reasonably have been understood by that client, is signed by the client, or the client’s conservator, guardian, or agent under a valid durable power of attorney.

(c) The disclosure states that the lawyer shall receive a commission and sets forth the amount of the commission and the actual percentage rate of the commission, if any. If the actual amount of the commission cannot be ascertained at the outset of the transaction, the disclosure shall include the actual percentage rate of the commission or the alternate basis upon which the commission will be computed, including an example of how the commission would be calculated.

(d) The disclosure identifies the source of the commission and the relationship between the source of the commission and the person receiving the commission.

(e) The disclosure is presented to the client at or prior to the time the recommendation of the financial product is made.

(f) The disclosure advises the client that he or she may obtain independent advice regarding the purchase of the financial product and will be given a reasonable opportunity to seek that advice.

(g) The disclosure contains a statement that the financial product may be returned to the issuing company within 30 days of receipt by the client for a refund as set forth in Section 10127.10 of the Insurance Code.

(h) The disclosure contains a statement that if the purchase of the financial product is for the purposes of Medi-Cal planning, the client has been advised of other appropriate alternatives, including spend-down strategies, and of the possibility of obtaining a fair hearing or obtaining a court order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 454, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6175.4.

(a) A client who suffers any damage as the result of a violation of this article by any lawyer may bring an action against that person to recover or obtain one or more of the following remedies:

(1) Actual damages, but in no case shall the total award of damages in a class action be less than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(2) An order enjoining the violation.

(3) Restitution of property.

(4) Punitive damages.

(5) Any other relief that the court deems proper.

(b) A client may seek and be awarded, in addition to the remedies specified in subdivision (a), an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) where the trier of fact (1) finds that the client has suffered substantial physical, emotional, or economic damage resulting from the defendant’s conduct, (2) makes an affirmative finding in regard to one or more of the factors set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 3345 of the Civil Code, and (3) finds that an additional award is appropriate. Judgment in a class action may award each class member the additional award where the trier of fact has made the foregoing findings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 454, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6175.5.

A violation of this article by a licensee shall be cause for discipline by the State Bar.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 125.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6175.6.

The court shall report the name, address, and professional license number of any person found in violation of this article to the appropriate professional licensing agencies for review and possible disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 454, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6176.

Nothing in this article shall be deemed to limit, reduce, or preclude enforcement of any obligation, statute, State Bar Rule of Professional Conduct, or court rule, including, but not limited to, those relating to the lawyer’s fiduciary duties, that are otherwise applicable to any transaction in which a lawyer is involved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 454, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6177.

The State Bar shall include in its Annual Discipline Report information on the number of complaints filed against California attorneys alleging a violation of this article. The report shall also include the type of charges made in each complaint, the number of resulting investigations initiated, and the number and nature of any disciplinary actions taken by the State Bar for violations of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 227, Sec. 26.   (AB 3279)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Cessation of Law Practice—Jurisdiction of Courts [6180. - 6185.]

6180.

When an attorney engaged in law practice in this state dies, resigns, becomes an inactive licensee of the State Bar, is disbarred, or is suspended from the active practice of law and is required by the order of suspension to give notice of the suspension, notice of cessation of law practice shall be given and the courts of this state shall have jurisdiction, as provided in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 127.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6180.1.

The notice shall contain any information that may be required by any order of disbarment, suspension, or of acceptance of the attorneys’ resignation, by any rule of the Supreme Court, Judicial Council, or the State Bar, and by any order of a court of the state having jurisdiction pursuant to this article or Article 12 (commencing with Section 6190) of this chapter. It shall be mailed to all persons who are then clients, to opposing counsel, to courts and agencies in which the attorney then had pending matters with an identification of the matter, to any errors and omissions insurer, to the Office of the Chief Trial Counsel of the State Bar and to any other person or entity having reason to be informed of the death, change of status or discontinuance or interruption of law practice. In the event of the death or incompetency of the attorney, the notice shall be given by the personal representative or guardian or conservator of the attorney or, if none, by the person having custody or control of the files and records of the attorney. In other cases, the notice shall be given by the attorney or a person authorized by the attorney or by the person having custody and control of the files and records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 156, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6180.2.

Notwithstanding the giving of notice pursuant to Section 6180.1, the superior court on its own motion, or a client of the attorney, the State Bar, or an interested person or entity may make application to the superior court for the county where the attorney maintains or more recently has maintained his or her principal office for the practice of law or where he or she resides, for assumption by the court of jurisdiction over the law practice to the extent provided in this article. In any proceeding under this article, the State Bar shall be permitted to intervene and to assume primary responsibility for conducting the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 582, Sec. 2.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

6180.3.

The application shall be verified, and shall state facts supporting the occurrence of one or more of the events stated in Section 6180 and either of the following:

(a) Belief that supervision of the court is warranted because the attorney has left an unfinished client matter for which no other active licensee of the State Bar has, with the consent of the client, agreed to assume responsibility.

(b) Belief that the interests of one or more clients of the attorney or of one or more other interested persons or entities will be prejudiced if the proceeding herein provided is not maintained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 128.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6180.4.

The application shall be set for hearing and an order to show cause shall be issued, directing the attorney, or his or her personal representative, or, if none, the person having custody and control of the files and records, to show cause why the court should not assume jurisdiction over the law practice as provided in this article. A copy of the application and order to show cause shall be served upon the person to whom it is directed by personal delivery or, as an alternate method of service, by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the attorney at the latest address shown on the official licensing records of the State Bar or to the personal representative at the latest address shown in the probate proceeding. Service is complete at the time of mailing, but any prescribed
 period of notice and any right or duty to do any act or make any response within that prescribed period or on a date certain after notice is served by mail shall be extended five days if the place of address is within the State of California, 10 days if the place of address is outside the State of California but within the United States, and 20 days if the place of address is outside the United States. If the attorney has a guardian or conservator, copies shall also be served upon such fiduciary in similar manner. If the State Bar is not the applicant, copies shall also be served upon the Office of the Chief Trial Counsel of the State Bar in similar manner at the time of service on the attorney. The court may prescribe additional or alternative methods of service of the application and order to show cause, and may prescribe methods of notifying and serving notices and process upon other persons and entities in cases not specifically provided for herein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 129.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6180.5.

If the court finds that one or more of the events stated in Section 6180 has occurred, and that supervision of the courts is warranted because the affected attorney has left an unfinished client matter for which no other active licensee of the State Bar has with consent of the client agreed to assume responsibility, or that the interest of one or more of the clients of the attorney or one or more other interested persons or entities will be prejudiced if the proceeding herein provided is not maintained, it may make an order assuming jurisdiction over the attorney’s practice pursuant to this article. If the person to whom the order to show cause is directed does not appear the court may make its order upon the verified application or such proof as it may require. Thereupon the court shall appoint one or more
 active licensees of the State Bar to act under its direction to mail a notice of cessation of law practice pursuant to Section 6180.1 and may order such appointed attorneys to do one or more of the following:

(a) Examine the files and records of the law practice, and obtain information as to any pending matters which may require attention.
